District of Columbia statutes.
48-833.07

Rulemaking.

The Mayor is authorized to issue any rules necessary to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

May 18, 2004, D.C. Law 15-164, § 307, 51 DCR 3688
Delegation of Authority Pursuant to D.C. Law 16-62, the AccessRx Act of 2004, see Mayor’s Order 2006-60, June 7, 2006 ( 53 DCR 5322).